Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 14 False Personation

11-14-1.
Impersonation of public officer.

Every person who shall falsely assume or pretend to be a judge, justice of the peace, warden, deputy sheriff, alderman, member of any city or town council, city or town clerk, city sergeant, constable, correctional officer, any other officer of any city or town in this state as well as any out-of-state police, or the attorney general, deputy attorney general, assistant or special assistant attorney general, and shall act as such, shall be imprisoned not exceeding one year or be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 17; G.L. 1956, §

11-14-1

; P.L. 1996, ch. 318, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 245, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 586, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 32; P.L. 2013, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 392, § 1.

11-14-2.
Impersonation of town sealer, auctioneer, corder, or fence-viewer.

Every person who shall falsely assume or pretend to be a town sealer of weights and measures, auctioneer, corder of wood, or fence-viewer, and shall act as such, shall be fined not less than twenty dollars ($20.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 276, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 342, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 394, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 605, § 18; G.L. 1956, §

11-14-2

.

11-14-3.
Repealed.

11-14-4.
Unauthorized wearing of organizational insignia.

Any person not a member, respectively, of the Society of Cincinnati; Society of the War of 1812; Aztec Club of 1847; Military Order of the Loyal Legion of the United States; Grand Army of the Republic; National Association of Naval Veterans of the United States; Society of the Army of the Potomac; Society of the Army of the Cumberland; Society of the Army of Ohio; Society of the Army of Tennessee; Society of the Burnside Expedition; Society of the Ninth Army Corps; Sons of Veterans, United States of America; Society of the Sons of the American Revolution; Sons of the Revolution; United Spanish-American War Veterans; Women’s Relief Corps; Ladies’ Aid Society; Society of the Daughters of the American Revolution; Benevolent and Protective Order of Elks of the United States; Knights of Pythias; Dramatic Order of Knights of Khorassan; American Legion; Military Order of Foreign Wars of the United States; Veterans of Foreign Wars of the United States; Fraternal Order of Police; International Brotherhood of Police Officers (IBPO), the International Association of Firefighters (IAFF) whether it be IAFF windshield decals or IAFF license plate emblems or both; or any person not a member respectively of any other society or association or of any labor union which shall have registered in the office of the secretary of state a facsimile or duplicate or description of its name, badge, decoration, insignia, button, emblem, or rosette, who shall use or wear, respectively, the name, badge, decoration, insignia, button, emblem, or rosette of that organization, unless he or she shall be entitled to use or wear it, respectively under the constitution, bylaws, or rules and regulations of the societies or orders, respectively, shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 283, § 22; P.L. 1900, ch. 742, § 1; P.L. 1906, ch. 1358, § 1; P.L 1907, ch. 1448, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 349, § 31; P.L. 1909, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 1918, ch. 1642, § 1; P.L. 1920, ch. 1833, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 401, § 31; G.L. 1938, ch. 612, § 30; G.L. 1956, §

11-14-4

; P.L. 1968, ch. 117, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 259, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 474, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 390, § 1.

11-14-5.
Unauthorized use of American Federation of Musicians label.

Any person who willfully uses or displays the label or logo of the American Federation of Musicians without the written permission of, or in any manner not authorized by, the federation shall be fined not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1976, ch. 70, § 1.

11-14-6.
Impersonation of a public utility company employee.

Every person who shall falsely assume or pretend to be an employee of a public utility company, or the employee of a nonregulated power producer, and act as such so as to gain or attempt to gain entry into any residence or business, for any purpose, shall be imprisoned not exceeding six (6) months, or be fined not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 128, § 1.